District of Columbia statutes.
24-531.11

Tolling provisions.

In computing any time period in this chapter, the court shall exclude the following periods:

(1)

Any time in which the defendant is unable to participate in a preliminary screening examination, a full competence examination, or treatment to restore competence due to physical incapacity;

(2)

Any time in which the defendant fails or refuses to participate in a preliminary screening examination, a full competence examination, or treatment to restore competence;

(3)

Any time due to the defendant’s failure to appear for a preliminary screening examination, a full competence examination, or treatment to restore competence; and

(4)

Any time from the filing of a motion or petition through its disposition, including any appeals, which prevents or delays the conduct of a preliminary screening examination, a full competence examination, or treatment to restore competence, including involuntary medication.

May 24, 2005, D.C. Law 15-358, § 111, 52 DCR 2015